Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1087
Salon license; renewal; insurance.

The procedure for renewing a salon license shall be in accordance with section 38-143, except that in addition to all other requirements, the salon shall submit evidence of minimal property damage, bodily injury, and liability insurance coverage for the salon.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 86;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 86;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,125;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 349.